Hawaii statutes.
[§481R-7] General warrantor operation
requirements. (a) A warrantor may appoint a designee to be responsible
for any or all of the administration of vehicle protection products and for
compliance with this chapter. The designee shall be liable to the extent the
warrantor would be liable for violations of this chapter committed by the
designee.

(b) A vehicle protection product may not be
issued, sold, or offered for sale in this State unless at the time of purchase
the warrantor provides to the consumer:

(1) A copy of the vehicle protection product
warranty; or

(2) A receipt for, or other written evidence of, the
purchase of the vehicle protection product.

(c) A warrantor who complies with subsection
(b)(2), within thirty days after the date of purchase, shall provide to the
consumer a copy of the vehicle protection product warranty.

(d) A warrantor shall indemnify a seller who
pays or is obligated to pay a consumer any money the warrantor is obligated to
pay under the terms of the vehicle protection product warranty, including
damages, reasonable attorney's fees, and costs. [L 2002, c 237, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next